Utah statutes.
26-6-9.   Tuberculosis -- Testing of high risk individuals.
Individuals at high risk for tuberculosis shall be tested as required by
department rule.  The department rule:
(1)  shall establish criteria to identify individuals who are at high risk for
tuberculosis; and
(2)  may establish who is responsible for the costs of the testing.
